Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,209
Snowmobiles; registration; application.

Application for registration shall be made to the county treasurer in
such form as the director prescribes and shall state the name and address
of the applicant, state a description of the snowmobile, including color,
manufacturer, and identification number, and be signed by at least one owner.
Application forms shall be made available through the county treasurer's office
of each county in this state. Upon receipt of the application and the appropriate
fee as provided in section 60-3,210, the snowmobile shall be registered by
the county treasurer and a validation decal shall be provided which
shall be affixed to the upper half of the snowmobile in such manner as the
director prescribes. Snowmobiles owned by a dealer and operated for demonstration
or testing purposes shall be exempt from affixing validation decals to the
snowmobile but are required to carry a valid validation decal with the snowmobile
at all times. Application for registration shall be made within fifteen days
after the date of purchase.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 209;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 93.